Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; STATE PATROL AIRCRAFT.new text end new text begin (a) $14,500,000 is appropriated in fiscal year 2026 from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of public safety to purchase and equip a helicopter for the State Patrol. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) $2,300,000 is appropriated in fiscal year 2026 from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of public safety to purchase a Cirrus single-engine airplane for the State Patrol. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (c) $1,700,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,700,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of public safety for staff and equipment costs of pilots for the State Patrol. new text end